Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1002] Faculty; classification
schedule. The board of regents shall classify all members of the faculty
of the university including research workers, extension agents, and all
personnel engaged in instructional work as referenced in section 76-16, and
adopt a classification schedule and compensation plan for these employees.

Annual increases of compensation shall be
allowable for efficient service, and the board of regents shall adopt a fair
and reasonable plan for rating the efficiency of individual employees affected
by this section. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next